Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 9 Services for People Who Are Blind or Visually Impaired

40-9-1.
Administrator — Other personnel and expenses — Appropriations — References to “bureau for the blind.”

The director of human services may appoint a man or a woman qualified by training and experience as administrator of services for people who are blind or visually impaired, to hold office during his or her pleasure, subject to the provisions of chapter 4 of title 36; employ assistants, teachers, and agents as may be necessary; fix their compensation within the amounts appropriated therefor; and incur other expenses as may be authorized by the general assembly. The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum as it may deem necessary to pay the salary of the administrator, assistants, teachers, and agents.

Whenever in any existing law the term “bureau for the blind” occurs, the term shall hereafter be construed to mean the department of human services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 27; P.L. 1930, ch. 1590, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 184, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1940, ch. 802, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 6, §§ 1, 5; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-2.
General duties of administrator.

The administrator of services for people who are blind or visually impaired shall devote all of his or her time to the duties of his or her office and keep at his or her office in the state house a register of individuals who are blind or visually impaired in the state, describing their condition, cause of blindness, and capacity for education and industrial training.

The administrator shall, under the direction of the director, generally be charged with:

Maintaining a placement service with the object of determining the fitness of applicants who are blind or visually impaired for work, vocational guidance, and securing occupation when applicants are trained;

Assisting, when called upon by the school-to-careers committee of the governor’s workforce board, that board in its work for students who are blind or visually impaired and in the application of federal aid;

Assisting the department of elementary and secondary education, when called upon by it, in performing its duties under chapter 25 of title 16 [repealed];

Having general charge of the home teaching of persons who are blind or visually impaired in the state;

Having charge of workshops for the training of persons who are blind or visually impaired and salesrooms for the sale of the products of the blind and visually impaired as the director may, from time to time, establish; and

Performing other duties with respect to his or her office as the director may prescribe.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 27; P.L. 1930, ch. 1590, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 184, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-2

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 21.

40-9-3.
Advisory council — Appointment of members.

Within the department of human services there shall be an advisory council to assist in promoting the interests of people who are blind or visually impaired consisting of nine (9) members, eight (8) of whom shall be qualified electors of the state, who shall be selected with particular regard to their interest in and their knowledge of the conditions regarding the blind and visually impaired and who shall be appointed by the governor as herein provided, and one of whom shall be the chairperson of the state council on independent living services, ex officio. In the month of February in each year, the governor shall appoint one member, except in the month of February 1970 and every fifth year thereafter when he or she shall appoint four (4) members, each member to hold office until the first day of March in the fifth year after his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, to succeed the member whose term will next expire. Any vacancy that may occur in the council shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 90; P.L. 1940, ch. 801, § 1; redesignated § 91 by P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-3

; P.L. 1970, ch. 56, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-4.
Chairperson of advisory council — Secretarial service.

The members of the council shall elect one of their number as chairperson upon the appointment of any new member for a full term and whenever the office may become vacant. The members of the council shall serve without compensation and secretarial service for the council shall be provided by the director of the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 90; P.L. 1940, ch. 801, § 1; redesignated § 91 by P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-4

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-9-5.
Functions of advisory council.

The council shall confer with and shall advise the director of human services in promoting the interests of people who are blind or visually impaired in the state and concerning the policies, rules, and regulations appertaining thereto; provided, however, that the advisory council shall have no administrative power.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 90; P.L. 1940, ch. 801, § 1; redesignated § 91 by P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-5

; impl. am. P.L. 1962, ch. 6, § 5; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-6.
Home instruction of people who are blind or visually impaired.

The director of human services is hereby authorized and empowered to provide for the instruction at their homes of the adult residents who are blind or visually impaired residents of this state upon such conditions and in such manner as may to him or her seem proper, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum as it may deem necessary for the purposes of this section; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum or so much thereof as may, from time to time, be necessary, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of the department and by the administration of services for people who are blind or visually impaired. Receipts from the toy lending library shall be deposited as general revenue and the activity shall be funded through general revenue appropriations.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 413, art. 1, § 27; P.L. 1930, ch. 1590, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 184, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-6

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 121; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-7.
Supplies and materials for people who are blind or visually impaired workers — Compensation for services.

The director is hereby authorized and empowered to carry on services for people who are blind or visually impaired by providing for the furnishing of supplies and materials for workers who are blind or visually impaired workers, and compensating people who are blind or visually impaired workers for services through funds made available to the department of human services.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1940, ch. 802, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-7

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-8.
Proceeds of work of blind and visually impaired workers.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of §

40-9-7

, the receipts from the sales of handiwork of people who are blind or visually impaired workers shall be collected by the department of human services and turned over to the general treasurer, and the funds shall be made available for expenditure by the department of human services for the purpose of buying supplies and materials for workers who are blind or visually impaired workers and to compensate people who are workers who are blind or visually impaired for services rendered; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sums as may be required, from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of human services, or his or her duly authorized agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 802, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-8

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-9.
Cooperation with department of elementary and secondary education.

The department of elementary and secondary education and the department of human services shall cooperate in measures for the prevention of blindness, the restoration of eyesight, and vocational adjustment of blind and visually impaired persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1938, ch. 2622, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1940, ch. 802, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-9

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1.

40-9-10.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2296, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 184, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1940, ch. 802, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-10

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 14, effective July 12, 1990.

40-9-10.1.
Telephone access to information programs.

The department of human services shall establish, administer, and promote an adaptive telephone equipment loan program. The department of human services, with the assistance of the state’s adaptive telephone equipment loan program committee, established pursuant to §

39-23-1

, shall also develop the appropriate rules, regulations, and service standards necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection.

The department of human services shall establish, administer, and promote a program to provide telephone access to the text of newspaper programs to residents who are blind, deaf/blind, visually impaired, or reading impaired with a single-party telephone line. The department of human services, with the assistance of the governor’s advisory council for the blind, shall also develop the appropriate rules, regulations, and service standards necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 378, § 5; P.L. 2004, ch. 504, § 5.

40-9-11.
Cooperation in federal business enterprises program.

The Rhode Island state department of human services is hereby empowered to cooperate with the United States government’s Department of Education in its “Business Enterprises Program for the Blind” and, in connection with the program, to accept the payments and/or reimbursement for one-half (1/2) of the necessary expenditures for the acquisition of state-controlled vending stands or other business enterprises equipment for the use of persons who are blind, for which appropriation is made by Title II — “Office of Vocational Rehabilitation,” of Public Law 80-165, passed by the Eightieth Congress of the United States, approved July 8, 1947, and known as the “Labor-Federal Security Appropriation Act of 1948.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2007, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-11

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-11.1.
Authorization to establish vending facilities for the blind on state property.

For the purposes of providing persons who are blind or visually impaired with remunerative employment, enlarging the economic opportunities people who are blind or visually impaired, and stimulating people who are blind or visually impaired to greater efforts in striving to make themselves self-supporting, persons who are blind or visually impaired licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall be authorized to operate vending facilities on any state property.

In authorizing the operation of vending facilities on state property, priority shall be given to persons who are blind or visually impaired licensed by the department of human services administering state services for people who are blind or visually impaired as provided in the Randolph-Sheppard Act, Pub. L. No. 74-732, as amended by Pub. L. No. 83-565 and Pub. L. No. 93-516, 20 U.S.C. § 107 et seq. The director of human services shall, after consultation with the director of administration and other heads of departments, agencies, or instrumentalities of the state in control of the maintenance, operation, and protection of state property; prescribe regulations designed to assure that:

The priority under this section is given to licensed persons who are blind or visually impaired (including the assignment of vending machine income pursuant to §

40-9-11.5

to achieve and protect such priority); and

Wherever feasible, one or more vending facilities are established on all state property to the extent that any facility or facilities would not adversely affect the interest of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-11.2.
Validity of limitations on placement or operation.

Any limitation on the placement or operation of a vending facility based on a finding that the placement or operation would adversely affect the interests of the state shall be fully justified, in writing, to the director of administration, who shall determine whether the limitation is justified. A determination made by the director of administration pursuant to this provision shall be binding on any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state so affected by the determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

40-9-11.3.
Provision for vending machines in buildings purchased or leased by state.

Whenever any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state shall undertake to acquire by ownership, rent, lease, or to otherwise occupy, in whole or in part, any building, the department, agency, or instrumentality shall make all reasonable attempts to ensure that the building includes a satisfactory site or sites for the location and operation of a vending facility by a person who is blind or visually impaired. Each department, agency, or instrumentality is hereby encouraged to provide timely notice to the director of human services that the acquisition, construction, or renovation of the building is planned in order to permit appropriate planning, selection, and preparation of the site or sites by the state services for people who are blind or visually impaired.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-11.4.
Compliance with chapter.

To ensure that persons who are blind or visually impaired licensed as vending facility operators are afforded the maximum opportunity by which to engage in the conduct of vending within state buildings, it is hereby intended that all agencies, departments, and institutions comply with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-11.5.
Vending machine income.

Vending machine income obtained from the operation of vending machines on state property shall accrue: (1) To the licensee who is blind or visually impaired operating a vending facility on state property, or (2) In the event there is no licensee who is blind or visually impaired operating the facility on state property, to the state services for people who are blind or visually impaired for use in the support of the administration of the business enterprises, vending facilities program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-11.6.
Definitions.

“Licensed operator” means a person who is blind or visually impaired who has received from the state services for persons who are blind or visually impaired a license that entitles the person to operate a vending facility, receive the profits therefrom, and take responsibility for the continuous maintenance of the facility to which he or she is assigned.

“Person who is blind or visually impaired” means a person whose visual acuity is found to be twenty/two hundred (20/200) or less in the better eye with best correction, or visual acuity of better than twenty/two hundred (20/200) if the widest diameter of the field of vision subtends an angle no greater than twenty (20) degrees. Blindness shall be determined by a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, and certification thereof shall be made by the ophthalmological consultant at the state services for people who are blind or visually impaired.

“State property” means any building, land, or other real property owned, leased, or occupied by any department, agency, or instrumentality wholly owned by the state, unless, with respect to any building, land, or other real property, leased or rented by the state, the lease or rental agreement shall prohibit the establishment of the vending facilities. The state shall use its best efforts to obtain permission to establish vending facilities in buildings, land, or other real property hereafter leased or rented by the state.

“Vending facility” means automatic vending machines, cafeterias, snack bars, cart service, shelters, counters, and other appropriate auxiliary equipment necessary for the sale of newspapers, periodicals, confections, tobacco products, foods, beverages, and other articles or services dispensed automatically or manually and prepared on or off the premises in accordance with all applicable health laws, as determined by the state services for people who are blind or visually impaired, and including the vending or exchange of chances for any lottery authorized by state law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-12.
Agreements as to business enterprises program.

The state department of human services is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with the department of elementary and secondary education, and/or its office of vocational rehabilitation for cooperation in the business enterprises program, and, from time to time, to amend the agreements; provided, any agreement or amendment shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2007, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-12

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 15.

40-9-13.
Federal business enterprises funds.

The general treasurer shall receive and provide for the proper custody of all funds paid to the state from the federal treasury under the provisions of Public Law 80-165, 29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq., and shall disburse the funds upon orders drawn by the state controller upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2007, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-13

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-9-14.
Application of receipts from business enterprises program.

All receipts collected by the state department of human services as a result of the operation of the program shall be deposited with the general treasurer and are hereby appropriated to carry out the purposes of §§

40-9-11

—

40-9-13

. Any unexpended balance of the receipts, remaining at the end of the fiscal year, shall be carried forward and made available for expenditure in the succeeding fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2007, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-14

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-9-15.
Reports of blindness of persons.

Whenever, upon examination at a clinic, hospital, or other institution, or elsewhere, by a physician, optometrist or other person, the visual acuity of any person is found to be twenty/two hundred (20/200) or less in the better eye with the best correction, or the visual acuity is better than twenty/two hundred (20/200) if the widest diameter of the field of vision subtends an angle no greater than twenty (20) degrees, the superintendent or other person in charge of the clinic, hospital, or other institution, or the physician, optometrist, or other person who conducted or was in charge of the examination if it took place elsewhere than in the clinic, hospital, or other institution, shall, within thirty (30) days, report to the director of the department of human services the result of the examination, and that the blindness of the person examined has been established.

Any state, city, and town agencies administering benefits to the blind or visually impaired by way of tax exemptions, welfare payments, or otherwise, shall report the names of the persons to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles for the purpose of evaluation by the medical advisory board within the division of motor vehicles as to the fitness of the persons to safely operate motor vehicles upon the highways of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 105, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-15

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99.

40-9-16.
Immunity from liability.

No person, who shall render any report required by §

40-9-15

, shall be subject to a suit in a civil action, or liable for civil damages, in any action or proceedings arising out of the information contained in the reports submitted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 223, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-16

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-9-17.
Confidentiality of reports — Authorized uses — Penalty for disclosure.

All reports mentioned in §

40-9-15

are hereby declared to constitute confidential matter. It shall be unlawful for any person to make use of, or cause to be used, any information contained in the reports for purposes not directly connected with the administration of services for people who are blind or visually impaired or the division of motor vehicles, except with the consent of the individual concerned.

The director of human services shall have the power to establish rules and regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of the reports, which shall have the same force and effect as law. The reports shall be produced in response to a subpoena duces tecum properly issued by any federal or state court; provided, however, that the purpose for which the subpoena is sought is directly connected with the administration of services for people who are blind or visually impaired. No subpoena shall be issued by a court asking either for the reports, or for persons having custody or access to the reports, unless the litigation involved in the matter is directly connected with the administration of services for people who are blind or visually impaired.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this section, or the lawful rules and regulations made hereunder, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or shall be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the director of the department of human services, or his or her agents duly authorized for that purpose, from issuing any statistical material or data, or publishing or causing the data to be published whenever he or she shall deem it to be in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 105, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

40-11-17

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 99; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 99; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 21.

40-9-18.
Blindness prevention.

The department of human services shall, in consultation with the governor’s advisory council for the blind and Saving Sight Rhode Island, establish a blindness-prevention program for children of the state of Rhode Island to promote the screening, testing, diagnosis, and treatment of blindness diseases of the eye and other sight disorders.

The department of human services shall promulgate rules and regulations in order to effectuate the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 213, § 1.